Louisiana, session 2026, HB891.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.46(B) and (C) and 463.53(C) and (D) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.46. Special prestige license plates; Louisiana Quail Forever plate
* * *
B. The charge for this special license plate shall be twenty-six dollars, which
shall be assessed every two years in addition to the regular fee charged under the
provisions of R.S. 47:463. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of fifty
dollars for this special prestige license plate that shall be disbursed in accordance
with Subsection C of this Section. This fee shall be in addition to the standard motor
vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII, Section 5 of the Constitution of
Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and fifty cents for each plate to be
retained by the department to offset a portion of administrative costs.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 891 ENROLLED
C.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the revenues
realized from the additional twenty-six dollar fee imposed by Subsection B of this
Section shall be deposited immediately upon receipt in the state treasury. The state
treasurer shall place an amount equal to those revenues in the Conservation Fund,
after complying with the requirements of R.S. 56:10(B), and shall credit that amount
to the "quail account" which is created within the Conservation Fund through the
provisions of R.S. 56:10(B)(10). The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the
department and forwarded to the Quail Forever organization, to be used solely for
the conservation of quails and their habitats in Louisiana. The monies received from
the royalty fees shall be used solely to support the activities of the Quail Forever
organization. The purchaser of the plate shall be classified as a member of the Quail
Forever and will receive an annual membership.
(2) Five percent of the net proceeds from the twenty-six dollar fee imposed
by Subsection B of this Section shall be used to promote the existence of the
Louisiana Quail Forever prestige license plate and its availability for use on
passenger vehicles.
* * *
§463.53. Special prestige license plates; Ducks Unlimited
* * *
C. The charge for this special license plate shall be fifty dollars in addition
to the regular fee charged under the provisions of R.S. 47:463. The department shall
collect an annual royalty fee of fifty dollars for this special prestige license plate that
shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection D of this Section. This fee shall be
in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII, Section
5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and fifty cents
for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of administrative
costs.
D. The revenues realized from the additional fifty-dollar fee imposed by
Subsection C of this Section shall be remitted to the state as provided by law. The
state treasurer shall place an amount equal to those revenues in the Conservation
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 891 ENROLLED
Fund, after complying with the requirements of R.S. 56:10(B), and shall credit that
amount to the "waterfowl account" which is created within the Conservation Fund
through the provisions of R.S. 56:10(B)(8). The funds raised from the license plates
shall be used solely for the purpose of conserving, restoring, and enhancing
migratory waterfowl habitat in Louisiana. The annual royalty fee shall be collected
by the department and forwarded to the Louisiana Ducks Unlimited organization, to
be used solely for the conservation of ducks and their habitats in Louisiana. The
monies received from the royalty fees shall be used solely to support the activities
of the Louisiana Ducks Unlimited organization. The purchaser of the plate shall be
classified as a member of the Louisiana Ducks Unlimited and will receive an annual
membership.
* * *
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; Conserve Louisiana
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Conserve
Louisiana" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for such
plates. The license plates shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pick up trucks,
recreational vehicles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the Department of Wildlife
and Fisheries to select the color and design of the plate, provided it is in compliance
with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include the words "Conserve Louisiana".
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application to any
citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
D. The fee for the plate shall be fifty dollars in addition to the standard motor
vehicle registration license fee, and a handling fee of three dollars and fifty cents for
each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of administrative costs.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 891 ENROLLED
E. The revenues realized from the fifty dollar fee imposed by Subsection D
of this Section shall be deposited immediately upon receipt in the state treasury.
After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the
Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund, and
prior to money being placed in the state general fund, the state treasurer shall place
an amount equal to those revenues in the Conservation Fund, after complying with
the requirements of R.S. 56:10(B).
F. The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 56:10(B)(8) and (10) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, is hereby directed to credit the existing amount of revenue generated from the
collection of fees pursuant to R.S. 47:463.46 and R.S. 47:463.53 and route it to the
appropriate organization as required by law prior to January 1, 2027.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.